Massachusetts, session 194th, H4701.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1 of Chapter 41 or of any general
or special law to the contrary, there shall be in the Town of Orange a 5-member Board of
Selectmen, with each member to be elected for terms of three years so arranged so that the term
of at least 1 member shall expire each year. The Board of Selectmen, as the Chief Executive
Officer of the Town, shall have the powers and duties of a Board of Selectmen under the
provisions of any general or special law.
SECTION 2. Action taken by the Board of Selectmen and the town meeting increasing
the size of the Board of Selectmen shall hereby be ratified, validated, and confirmed to the same
extent as if the act had been in place prior thereto.
of 2

SECTION 3. Members of the Board of Selectmen serving as of the effective date of this
Act shall continue to serve out the remainder of their unexpired terms or sooner vacating of the
office.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2